District of Columbia statutes.
31-3801

Payable benefits.

All individual and group health insurance policies providing coverage on an expense-incurred basis and individual and group service-or indemnity-type contracts issued by a nonprofit health service plan shall provide that health insurance benefits shall be payable with respect to a newly born child of the insured or subscriber from the moment of birth.

Oct. 20, 1979, D.C. Law 3-33, § 2, 26 DCR 1116

History

Hospital and medical services corporations, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 35-1101.
1973 Ed., § 35-2001.

Prior Codifications